Maryland, session 2025, HB0592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
10–6A–02.
(b) This subtitle may not be construed to abridge or modify any civil right of the
respondent, including:
(1) Any civil service ranking or appointment;
(2) The right to apply for voluntary admission to a facility under § 10–609
of this title; and
(3) [Any] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN §§ 5–133 AND 5–205 OF THE
PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE, ANY right relating to a license, permit, certification, privilege,
or benefit under any law.
Article – Public Safety
5–133.
(b) Subject to § 5–133.3 of this subtitle, a person may not possess a regulated
firearm if the person:
(1) has been convicted of a disqualifying crime;
(2) has been convicted of a violation classified as a common law crime and
received a term of imprisonment of more than 2 years;
(3) (i) has been convicted on or after October 1, 2023, of a second or
subsequent violation of § 4–104 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(ii) has been convicted on or after October 1, 2023, of a violation of §
4–104 of the Criminal Law Article if the violation resulted in the use of a loaded firearm by
a minor causing death or serious bodily injury to the minor or another person;
(4) subject to subsection (b–1) of this section, is on supervised probation
after being convicted:
(i) of a crime punishable by imprisonment for 1 year or more;
(ii) for a violation of § 21–902(b) or (c) of the Transportation Article;
or

HOUSE BILL 592 3
(iii) for violating a protective order under § 4–509 of the Family Law
Article;
(5) is a fugitive from justice;
(6) is a habitual drunkard;
(7) is addicted to a controlled dangerous substance or is a habitual user;
(8) suffers from a mental disorder as defined in § 10–101(i)(2) of the Health
– General Article and has a history of violent behavior against the person or another;
(9) has been found incompetent to stand trial under § 3–106 of the Criminal
Procedure Article;
(10) has been found not criminally responsible under § 3–110 of the
Criminal Procedure Article;
(11) has been voluntarily admitted for more than 30 consecutive days to a
facility as defined in § 10–101 of the Health – General Article;
(12) has been involuntarily committed to a facility as defined in § 10–101 of
the Health – General Article;
(13) is under the protection of a guardian appointed by a court under §
13–201(c) or § 13–705 of the Estates and Trusts Article, except for cases in which the
appointment of a guardian is solely a result of a physical disability;
(14) except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, is a respondent
against whom:
(i) a current non ex parte civil protective order has been entered
under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article; or
(ii) an order for protection, as defined in § 4–508.1 of the Family Law
Article, has been issued by a court of another state or a Native American tribe and is in
effect; [or]
(15) if under the age of 30 years at the time of possession, has been
adjudicated delinquent by a juvenile court for an act that would be a disqualifying crime if
committed by an adult; OR
(16) IS CURRENTLY A RESPONDENT SUBJECT TO A COURT ORDER TO
COMPLY WITH ASSISTED OUTPATIENT TREATMENT UNDER § 10–6A–08 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 592
5–133.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Facility” has the meaning stated in § 10–101 of the Health – General
Article.
(3) “NICS Index” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s National
Instant Criminal Background Check System.
(b) (1) A court shall promptly report information required in paragraph (2) of
this subsection through a secure data portal approved by the Department of Public Safety
and Correctional Services if a court:
(i) determines that a person is not criminally responsible under §
3–110 of the Criminal Procedure Article;
(ii) finds that a person is incompetent to stand trial under § 3–106 of
the Criminal Procedure Article; [or]
(iii) finds under § 13–201(c) or § 13–705 of the Estates and Trusts
Article that a person should be under the protection of a guardian, except for cases in which
the appointment of a guardian is solely a result of a physical disability; OR
(IV) ORDERS A PERSON TO COMPLY WITH ASSISTED OUTPATIENT
TREATMENT UNDER § 10–6A–08 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(2) On a finding or determination under paragraph (1) of this subsection,
the following information shall be reported to the NICS Index:
(i) the name and identifying information of the person; and
(ii) the date of the determination or finding.
(c) (1) A facility shall report information required in paragraph (2) of this
subsection regarding a person admitted to the facility under § 10–609 of the Health –
General Article or committed to the facility under Title 10, Subtitle 6, Part III of the Health
– General Article to the NICS Index through a secure data portal approved by the
Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services, if:
(i) the person has been admitted to a facility for 30 consecutive days
or more; or
(ii) the person has been involuntarily committed to a facility.
(2) On admission to a facility the following information shall be reported to
the NICS Index:

HOUSE BILL 592 5
(i) the name and identifying information of the person admitted or
committed;
(ii) the date the person was admitted or committed to the facility;
and
(iii) the name of the facility to which the person was admitted or
committed.
5–205.
(b) A person may not possess a rifle or shotgun if the person:
(1) has been convicted of a disqualifying crime as defined in § 5–101 of this
title;
(2) has been convicted of a violation classified as a crime under common
law and received a term of imprisonment of more than 2 years;
(3) is a fugitive from justice;
(4) is a habitual drunkard as defined in § 5–101 of this title;
(5) is addicted to a controlled dangerous substance or is a habitual user as
defined in § 5–101 of this title;
(6) suffers from a mental disorder as defined in § 10–101(i)(2) of the Health
– General Article and has a history of violent behavior against the person or another;
(7) has been found incompetent to stand trial under § 3–106 of the Criminal
Procedure Article;
(8) has been found not criminally responsible under § 3–110 of the
Criminal Procedure Article;
(9) has been voluntarily admitted for more than 30 consecutive days to a
facility as defined in § 10–101 of the Health – General Article;
(10) has been involuntarily committed to a facility as defined in § 10–101 of
the Health – General Article;
(11) is under the protection of a guardian appointed by a court under §
13–201(c) or § 13–705 of the Estates and Trusts Article, except for cases in which the
appointment of a guardian is solely a result of a physical disability;

HOUSE BILL 592
(12) except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, is a respondent
against whom:
(i) a current non ex parte civil protective order has been entered
under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article; or
(ii) an order for protection, as defined in § 4–508.1 of the Family Law
Article, has been issued by a court of another state or a Native American tribe and is in
effect; [or]
(13) if under the age of 30 years at the time of possession, has been
adjudicated delinquent by a juvenile court for an act that would be a disqualifying crime if
committed by an adult; OR
(14) IS CURRENTLY A RESPONDENT SUBJECT TO A COURT ORDER TO
COMPLY WITH ASSISTED OUTPATIENT TREATMENT UNDER § 10–6A–08 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, contingent on the taking effect of Chapter 704 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2024, and if Chapter 704 does not become effective, this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void. This Act shall remain effective
until the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 3 of Chapter 704 of
the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024. If that termination provision takes effect, this
Act shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted
to have any effect on that termination provision.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.